Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 3 CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT
19-3-308.3. Differential response program for child abuse or neglect cases of low or moderate risk - rules - evaluation.

There is created the differential response program, referred to in this section as the "program". The program will allow county departments of human or social services that choose to participate to address known or suspected incidents of intrafamilial
abuse or neglect that have been assessed as low or moderate risk, pursuant to rule of the state board. The executive director of the state department shall approve any county department of human or social services that
chooses to participate in the program, referred to in this section as a "participating county department".

The state department is authorized to solicit, accept, and expend gifts, grants, and donations for the implementation and administration of the program.

Participation in the program by families who are referred to the program is voluntary.

For each family referred to the program, neither the state department nor a county department of human or social services is required to make a finding concerning the alleged intrafamilial abuse or neglect in the family.

The state department and the participating county departments shall administer the program in accordance with rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

To the extent permitted by law and by any rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the participating county departments, in administering the program, shall cooperate with local community service organizations in
addressing known or suspected incidents of intrafamilial abuse or neglect.

The state board shall promulgate rules to define and implement differential response and for the administration of the program.

to (9) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2015.)

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire section added, (HB 10-1226), ch. 129, p. 425, § 3, effective April 15.

L. 2012:
(1)(a), (6), and (7) amended, (SB 12-011), ch. 55, p. 202, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 2015:
Entire section amended, (HB 15-1358), ch. 193, p. 640, § 1, effective May 14.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 129, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

19-3-308.5. Recorded interviews of child.

Any interview of a child conducted pursuant to section 19-3-308, concerning a report of child abuse, may be audiotaped or videotaped. However, interviews concerning reports of sexual child abuse are strongly encouraged to be videotaped. A competent interviewer
at a child advocacy center, as that term is defined in section 19-1-103, that has a memorandum of understanding with the agency responsible for the investigation or a competent interviewer for the agency responsible for the investigation
in accordance with such section shall conduct an audiotaped or videotaped interview; except that an interview must not be videotaped when doing so is impracticable under the circumstances or will result in trauma to the child,
as determined by the investigating agency. No more than one videotaped interview is required unless the interviewer or the investigating agency determines that additional interviews are necessary to complete an investigation. The
same interviewer shall conduct additional interviews, to the extent possible. The recordings must be preserved as evidence in the manner and for a period provided by law for maintaining such evidence. In addition, access to the
recordings is subject to the rules of discovery under the Colorado rules of criminal and civil procedure.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a videotaped deposition taken in accordance with and governed by section 18-3-413, C.R.S., or section 13-25-132, C.R.S., and rule 15 (d) of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure. In addition, this section
shall not apply to interviews of the child conducted after a dependency and neglect action or a criminal action has been filed with the court.

Any agency subject to the provisions of this section shall provide equipment necessary to videotape or audiotape the interviews or shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with a child advocacy center authorizing the use of such equipment. The investigating
agency shall train persons responsible for conducting videotaped interviews in accordance with this section; except that the agency shall not be responsible for training interviewers employed by a child advocacy center. The agency
shall adopt standards for persons conducting such interviews.

An agency that enters into a memorandum of understanding with a child advocacy center that employs interviewers shall assure that such interviewers meet the training standards for persons conducting interviews adopted by the agency pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section. In addition, an agency that enters into a memorandum of understanding with a child advocacy center that provides technical assistance for forensic interviews, forensic medical examinations, or evidence collection
or preservation may require that the child advocacy center meets the national performance standards for children's advocacy centers as established by the national accrediting body. These standards include, but are not limited to,
standards for forensic interviews to be conducted in a manner which is of a neutral, fact-finding nature and coordinated to avoid duplicative interviewing.

Source:

L. 91:
Entire section added, p. 229, § 5, effective May 24.

L. 93:
Entire section amended, p. 1169, § 2, effective January 1, 1994.

L. 2004:
(1)(a) and (1)(e) amended and (1)(f) added, p. 806, § 1, effective May 21; (1)(e)(II) repealed, p. 194, § 10, effective August 4.

L. 2016:
Entire section amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 760, § 32, effective June 6.

L. 2021:
(1) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 731, § 74, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
Amendments to subsection (1)(e) by House Bill 04-1061 and Senate Bill 04-067 were harmonized.

19-3-309. Immunity from liability - persons reporting.

Any person, other than the perpetrator, complicitor, coconspirator, or accessory, participating in good faith in the making of a report, in the facilitation of the investigation of such a report, or in a judicial proceeding held pursuant to this title,
the taking of photographs or X rays, or the placing in temporary protective custody of a child pursuant to section 19-3-405 or otherwise performing his duties or acting pursuant to this part 3 shall be immune from any liability, civil
or criminal, or termination of employment that otherwise might result by reason of such acts of participation, unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines that such person's behavior was willful, wanton, and malicious. For
the purpose of any proceedings, civil or criminal, the good faith of any such person reporting child abuse, any such person taking photographs or X rays, and any such person who has legal authority to place a child in protective custody
shall be presumed.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 770, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
Entire section amended, p. 916, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-10-110 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-309.5. Preconfirmation safety plan agreement - first-time minor incidents of child abuse or neglect - rules.

The county department and any person who is believed to be responsible for the abuse or neglect of a child as a result of an investigation of a report of child abuse or neglect pursuant to section 19-3-308 may agree to defer the filing of a confirmed
report of child abuse or neglect with the state department as required by section 19-3-307 and enter into a safety plan agreement when the following circumstances exist:

The person who is believed to be responsible for the child abuse or neglect has had no previous allegation of child abuse or neglect investigated;

The child abuse or neglect that the person is believed to be responsible for is at the level of a minor incident of abuse or neglect, as defined by rule of the state board;

The person who is believed to be responsible for the minor incident of child abuse or neglect and the county department decide on a mutually agreeable method for resolving the issues related to the report; and

The requirements set forth in the safety plan agreement for resolving the issues related to the report can be completed within sixty days after the report of child abuse or neglect is made to the county department or the local law enforcement agency.

If a person who is believed to be responsible for the child abuse or neglect completes the mutually agreed upon safety plan agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, then the county department shall release him or her from the
terms of the agreement and shall not file a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect related to the incident with the state department.

If a person who is believed to be responsible for the child abuse or neglect does not complete the mutually agreed upon safety plan agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, as determined by the county department, then the county
department shall file a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect with the state department.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to eliminate a county department's obligation to report to the state department that there was an investigation of a report of abuse or neglect of a child and to further report the county department's assessment
of risk, the county department's decision regarding a referral of the matter to child welfare services, and any county department decision to defer the filing of a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect pursuant to
this section.

Participation in a safety plan agreement by any county department and by any person who is believed to be responsible for child abuse or neglect shall be at the discretion of the person believed to be responsible for the child abuse or neglect. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to confer a right upon a person who is believed to be responsible for the abuse or neglect of a child to enter into a safety plan agreement or to require a county department to enter into a safety
plan agreement with a person who is believed to be responsible for the abuse or neglect of a child.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate a county department to expend moneys to provide services to persons for the purpose of entering into a safety plan agreement pursuant to this section.

For purposes of this section, "safety plan agreement" means an agreement between the county department and the person who is believed to be responsible for the abuse or neglect of a child, developed pursuant to this section after a safety assessment is
completed by the county department that identifies conditions that will endanger the child, in order to fully address all obvious safety concerns identified in the safety assessment.

The state board shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

An agreement to enter into a safety plan agreement pursuant to this section shall not negate a person's right to appeal a later finding of child abuse or neglect.

Source:

L. 2004:
Entire section added, p. 580, § 1, effective July 1.

19-3-310. Child abuse and child neglect diversion program.

The district attorney, upon recommendation of the county department or any person, may withhold filing a case against any person accused or suspected of child abuse or neglect and refer that person to a nonjudicial source of treatment or assistance, upon
conditions set forth by the county department and the district attorney. If a person is so diverted from the criminal justice system, the district attorney shall not file charges in connection with the case if the person participates
to the satisfaction of the county department and the district attorney in the diversion program offered.

The initial diversion shall be for a period not to exceed two years. This diversion period may be extended for one additional one-year period by the district attorney if necessary. Decisions regarding extending diversion time periods shall be made following
review of the person diverted by the district attorney and the county department.

If the person diverted successfully completes the diversion program to the satisfaction of the county department and the district attorney, he shall be released from the terms and conditions of the program, and no criminal filing for the case shall be
made against him.

Participation by a person accused or suspected of child abuse in any diversion program shall be voluntary.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 771, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-10-111 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-310.5. Mediation - pilot program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 1742, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:
(5) amended, p. 516, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(10) repealed, p. 732, § 23, effective May 18.

Editor's note:
Subsection (11) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1999. (See L. 94, p. 1742.)

19-3-311. Evidence not privileged.

The incident of privileged communication between patient and physician, between patient and registered professional nurse, or between any person licensed pursuant to article 245 of title 12, or certified or licensed school psychologist and client, which
is the basis for a report pursuant to section 19-3-304, shall not be a ground for excluding evidence in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report pursuant to this part 3. In addition, privileged communication shall not apply
to any discussion of any future misconduct or of any other past misconduct that could be the basis for any other report under section 19-3-304.

The privileged communication between husband and wife shall not be a ground for excluding evidence in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report pursuant to this part 3.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 771, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
Entire section amended, p. 699, § 6, effective June 7.

L. 90:
Entire section amended, p. 1024, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:
(1) amended, p. 1893, § 65, effective August 5.

L. 2019:
(1) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1682, § 113, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-10-112 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-312. Court proceedings.

The county department or local law enforcement agency receiving a report under section 19-3-304 or 19-3-305, in addition to taking such immediate steps pursuant to sections 19-3-401 and 19-3-308 (4) as may be required to protect a child, shall inform,
within seventy-two hours, the appropriate juvenile court or district court with juvenile jurisdiction that the child appears to be within the court's jurisdiction. Upon receipt of such information, the court shall make an immediate
investigation to determine whether protection of the child from further abuse is required and, upon such determination, may authorize the filing of a petition, as provided for in section 19-3-501 (2).

In any proceeding initiated pursuant to this section, the court shall name as respondents all persons alleged by the petition to have caused or permitted the abuse or neglect alleged in the petition. In every such case, the responsible person shall be
named as respondent. Summonses shall be issued for all named respondents in accordance with section 19-3-503.

Repealed.

If a report under section 19-3-304 or 19-3-305 is based solely on an allegation of emotional abuse as defined in section 19-1-103 (1)(a), if requested by any party to the proceeding or upon its own motion, the court shall order a report to be prepared
by an independent mental health-care provider. The independent mental health-care provider shall interview the child and the alleged perpetrator of the abuse. The costs of the report shall be split equally between the county and
the party requesting the report, unless the court finds that paying such costs would cause a hardship to the party.

If a petition is filed alleging that a child is neglected or dependent based upon section 19-3-102 (2), the county department shall engage in concurrent planning to expedite the permanency planning process for the child who is the subject of such petition.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 771, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 97:
(4) and (5) added, p. 1439, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2014:
(3) repealed, (SB 14-203), ch. 281, p. 1142, § 3, effective August 6.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-10-113 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-313. Central registry. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 771, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(3) to (7) amended and (14) added, p. 230, § 6, effective May 24.

L. 96:
(14) amended, p. 1586, § 12, effective July 1; (4), (5), and (7) amended and (5.5) added, p. 1287, § 2, effective January 1, 1997; (6)(b), (7)(b)(III), and (14) amended, p. 1173, § 9, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 99:
(5.5)(a) and (5.5)(b)(I) amended and (5.5)(b)(III) added, p. 1026, § 11, effective May 29; (5.5)(a) and (5.5)(b)(I) amended and (5.5)(b)(III) added, p. 1207, § 11, effective June 2.

L. 2000:
(1), (2)(e), (5), (5.5)(c), (7)(c)(I)(A), (7)(c)(I)(B), and (7)(c)(II) amended and (2)(f) and (7)(d) added, pp. 1720, 1721, §§ 1, 2, 3, effective June 1.

L. 2001:
(7)(b)(I), (7)(c), and (7)(d) amended and (7)(e) added, p. 854, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2002:
(10) amended, p. 1527, § 232, effective October 1.

L. 2003:
(8) amended, p. 1622, § 37, effective August 6; entire section repealed, p. 1398, § 2, effective January 1, 2004.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 196, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

19-3-313.5. State department duties - reports of child abuse or neglect - training of county departments - rules - notice and appeal process - confidentiality.

Legislative declaration. As a result of the report of the state auditor evaluating the performance of the state central registry of child protection released in November of 2001 and the subsequent repeal of the state central registry of child protection,
the general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the children and the citizens of the state of Colorado for the state department to modify the processing of records and reports of child abuse or
neglect. These modifications are intended to ensure that the state department is able to provide reliable, accurate, and timely information concerning records and reports of child abuse or neglect. In addition, these modifications
are intended to ensure compliance with federal law regarding the prompt expungement of any records or reports that are used for purposes of employment checks or other background checks in cases determined to be unsubstantiated
or false, while allowing the state department to maintain such records and reports in case files for the purpose of assisting in determinations of future risk and safety assessments. Finally, these modifications are intended to
ensure that the state department's procedural systems related to records and reports of child abuse or neglect provide adequate protection to the children and the citizens of the state of Colorado.

Training of county departments. On or before January 1, 2004, the state department shall modify the training provided to county departments to achieve consistency and standardization in the performance of the following duties:

Investigating reports of child abuse or neglect;

Reporting confirmed incidents of child abuse or neglect to the state department;

Preparing documents related to records and reports of child abuse or neglect;

Entering data into computer systems maintaining information related to records and reports of child abuse or neglect; and

Maintaining confidentiality in accordance with federal and state law.

Notice and appeals process - rules. On or before January 1, 2004, the state board, in consideration of input and recommendations from the county departments, shall promulgate rules to establish a process at the state level by which a person who is found
to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect filed with the state department pursuant to section 19-3-307 may appeal the finding of a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect to the state department. At a
minimum, the rules established pursuant to this subsection (3) must address the following matters, consistent with federal law:

The provision of adequate and timely written notice by the county departments of human or social services or, for an investigation pursuant to section 19-3-308 (4.5), by the agency that contracts with the state, using a form created by the state department,
to a person found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect of the person's right to appeal the finding of a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect to the state department;

The timeline and method for appealing the finding of a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect;

Designation of the entity, which entity must be one other than a county department of human or social services, with the authority to accept and respond to an appeal by a person found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect at
each stage of the appellate process;

The legal standards involved in the appellate process and a designation of the party who bears the burden of establishing that each standard is met;

The confidentiality requirements of the appeals process; and

Provisions requiring, and procedures in place that facilitate, the prompt expungement of and prevent the release of any information contained in any records and reports that are accessible to the general public or are used for purposes of employment or
background checks in cases determined to be unsubstantiated or false; except that the state department and the county departments of human or social services may maintain information concerning unsubstantiated reports in
casework files to assist in future risk and safety assessments.

Confidentiality - rules. On or before January 1, 2004, the state board shall promulgate rules to establish guidelines for the release of information contained in records and reports of child abuse or neglect for screening purposes to assure compliance
with sections 19-1-303 and 19-1-307 and any other state or federal law relating to confidentiality of records and reports of child abuse or neglect. Rules promulgated by the state board shall address the following:

How a request for information is to be processed;

Who may be granted access to information;

What information in the records and reports is to be made available to the person or entity granted access;

The purposes for which information contained in the records and reports may be made available to the person or entity granted access; and

The consequences of improper release of information related to records and reports of child abuse or neglect.

Source:

L. 2003:
Entire section added, p. 1398, § 3, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2018:
IP(3), (3)(a), (3)(c), and (3)(f) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 419, § 54, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 196, Session Laws of Colorado 2003. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session
Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-3-314. Confidentiality of records. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 773, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 90:
(2)(j) and (2)(k)(I) amended, p. 1392, § 8, effective May 4; entire section repealed, p. 1012, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
Subsections (2)(j) and (2)(k)(I) were amended in House Bill 90-1075. Those amendments were superseded by the repeal of the entire section in Senate Bill 90-61. Identical provisions were located in section 19-1-120 (2)(j)
and (2)(k) until it was repealed in 1994. These provisions are now located in section 19-1-307 (2)(j) and (2)(k).

19-3-315. Federal funds.

The department of human services is authorized to accept federal funds such as child abuse and neglect state grants which are available for the implementation of programs which would further the purposes of this part 3.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 775, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 94:
Entire section amended, p. 2683, § 200, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-10-117 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-316. Protection orders and emergency protection orders. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:
Entire section added, p. 744, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(1)(a), (2)(b), (2)(f), and (3) amended and (5) added, p. 2015, § 10, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:
(1)(d) amended, p. 1144, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(1)(a) and (5) amended, p. 1015, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
Entire section repealed, p. 554, § 5, effective July 1.

19-3-317. Screening tool - human trafficking.

On and after January 1, 2017, pursuant to the federal "Preventing Sex Trafficking and Strengthening Families Act", Pub.L. 113-183, the department and each county department, as defined in section 19-1-103, shall implement a uniform screening tool that
includes questions that are intended to identify children who are victims of human trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude, as described in section 18-3-504, or commercial sexual exploitation of a child, or who are at risk of being
such victims.

Source:

L. 2016:
Entire section added, (HB 16-1224), ch. 101, p. 291, § 3, effective January 1, 2017.

L. 2021:
Entire section amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 731, § 75, effective October 1.

19-3-318. Study of child welfare caseworker resiliency programs - creation - membership - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:
Entire section added, (HB 17-1283), ch. 227, p. 881, § 2, effective May 22.

Editor's note:
Subsection (6) provided for repeal of this section, effective September 1, 2018. (See L. 2017, p. 881.)